North Carolina, session 2025, HB930.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. FIRST RESPONDER APPRECIATION BONUS PROGRAM
SECTION 1.1. The following definitions apply in this Part:
(1) Appreciation bonus payment or bonus. – A one-time supplemental payment
to a first responder that does not become part of the first responder's base
salary.
(2) Base salary. – The regular, recurring annual compensation of a first responder,
excluding overtime pay, shift differentials, longevity pay, or any other
supplemental forms of compensation.
(3) Employing authority. – A State agency or a city, county, or other local
political subdivision of this State that employs first responders.
(4) First responder. – A public employee whose primary duties involve the
protection of life, property, or public safety during emergency situations,
including specifically:
a. Law enforcement officers.
b. Firefighters.
c. Emergency medical services personnel.
d. Public safety telecommunicators or dispatchers.
e. Nurses employed by public hospitals, health departments, correctional
facilities, or other government healthcare facilities.
(5) Public employee. – A person employed by an employing authority.
(6) Years of service. – The total number of years that a first responder has been
employed in a qualifying position by any employing authority within the
State.
SECTION 1.2. Appropriation for First Responders' and Teachers' Appreciation
Bonus Payments. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Public
Safety the sum of one hundred thirty million dollars ($130,000,000) in each year of the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide one-time bonus payments to eligible first responders as
defined in this act. The Department of Public Safety shall distribute these funds to employing
authorities based on the number of eligible first responders employed by each authority. Each
eligible first responder shall receive a bonus payment of one thousand five hundred dollars
*H930-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
($1,500) in each fiscal year. Funds distributed under this section shall be used exclusively for
bonus payments to eligible first responders and may not be used for administrative costs or other
purposes. Bonus payments made pursuant to this section shall be:
(1) Paid in addition to any other wages or benefits the first responder may be
entitled and are not part of the first responder's base salary;
(2) Treated as exempt from retirement deductions; and
(3) Subject to all applicable federal and State withholding taxes.
SECTION 1.3. Administration. – The Office of State Budget and Management shall
coordinate with the Department of Public Safety to distribute funds to employing authorities by
no later than November 1 of each fiscal year within the 2025-2027 biennium. Employing
authorities shall distribute bonus payments to eligible first responders no later than December 31
of each fiscal year. To be eligible for the bonus payment, a first responder must be employed by
an employing authority on the first day of October of the fiscal year in which the bonus is paid.
First responders who work less than full time shall receive a prorated bonus based on the
percentage of full-time equivalent hours worked. The Office of State Budget and Management
shall develop simplified procedures for the allocation and distribution of bonus funds and shall
provide necessary guidance to the Department of Public Safety and employing authorities. The
Department of Public Instruction shall assist in coordinating with local school administrative
units, charter schools, and regional schools. Employing authorities shall certify to the Department
of Public Safety the number of eligible first responders by October 15 of each fiscal year. By
February 15 of each fiscal year, employing authorities shall submit a verification that all bonus
payments have been distributed to eligible first responders. Any funds not expended for the
purposes specified in this section by the end of each respective fiscal year shall revert to the
General Fund.

PART II. TEACHERS' APPRECIATION BONUS PROGRAM
SECTION 2.1. Definition. – For purposes of this Part, the term "teacher" means a
classroom teacher, instructional support personnel, principal, or assistant principal employed by
any of the following: (i) a local school administrative unit, (ii) a charter school, (iii) a regional
school, (iv) a school operated under Article 9C of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes, or (v) a
school operated under Article 29A of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes.
SECTION 2.2. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Department of Public Instruction the sum of one hundred sixty-five million dollars
($165,000,000) in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide one-time bonus
payments to teachers. The Department of Public Instruction shall distribute these funds to local
school administrative units, charter schools, and regional schools based on the number of eligible
teachers employed by each entity. Each eligible teacher shall receive a bonus payment of one
thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) in each fiscal year. Funds distributed under this section
shall be used exclusively for bonus payments to eligible teachers and may not be used for
administrative costs or other purposes. Bonus payments made pursuant to this section shall be:
(1) Paid in addition to any other wages or benefits the first responder may be
entitled and are not part of the first responder's base salary;
(2) Treated as exempt from retirement deductions; and
(3) Subject to all applicable federal and State withholding taxes.
SECTION 2.3. Administration. – The State Board of Education and the Department
of Public Instruction shall establish procedures and guidelines for the administration of the
teacher bonus program consistent with this section. The Department of Public Instruction shall
distribute these funds to local school administrative units, charter schools, and regional schools
no later than November 1 of each fiscal year within the 2025-2027 biennium. To be eligible for
the bonus payment, a teacher must be employed by a local school administrative unit, charter
school, or regional school on the first day of October of the fiscal year in which the bonus is paid.
Page 2 House Bill 930-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Teachers who work less than full time shall receive a prorated bonus based on the percentage of
full-time equivalent hours worked. Local school administrative units, charter schools, and
regional schools shall certify to the Department of Public Instruction the number of eligible
teachers by October 15 of each fiscal year. By February 15 of each fiscal year, local school
administrative units, charter schools, and regional schools shall submit a verification that all
bonus payments have been distributed to eligible teachers. Any funds not expended for the
purposes specified in this section by the end of each respective fiscal year shall revert to the
General Fund.

PART III. STATE BUDGET ACT
SECTION 3.1. State Budget Act Applies. – The provisions of this act are subject to
compliance with Chapter 143C of the General Statutes. If there is a conflict between this act and
the State Budget Act (SBA), the provisions of the SBA shall control.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. Effective Date. – This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 930-First Edition Page 3